sl-SI: Združljivost opornice: Združljivo z zobnim aparatom; Združljivo z dvojnim zobnim aparatom; Ni združljivo z zobnim aparatom; Samo za zgornji zobni aparat; Drugo
ro-RO: Compatibilitatea aparatului dentar: Compatibil cu aparate dentare; Compatibil cu aparat dentar dublu; Incompatibil cu aparate dentare; Doar pentru aparat dentar superior; Altele
zh-TW: 牙套相容性: 相容於牙套; 相容於雙層牙套; 不相容於牙套; 僅適用於上牙套; 其他
ru: Совместимость брекетов: Совместимо с брекетами; Совместимо с двойными брекетами; Не совместимо с брекетами; Только для верхних брекетов; Другое
th: ความเข้ากันได้กับอุปกรณ์จัดฟัน: รองรับการจัดฟัน; รองรับการจัดฟันแบบคู่; ไม่รองรับการจัดฟัน; เฉพาะจัดฟันบน; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 牙套兼容性: 兼容牙套; 兼容双排牙套; 不兼容牙套; 仅兼容上牙套; 其他
el: Συμβατότητα με αντηρίδες: Συμβατό με σιδεράκια; Συμβατό με διπλά σιδεράκια; Μη συμβατό με σιδεράκια; Μόνο για πάνω σιδεράκια; Άλλο
pl: Zgodność ortez: Zgodny z aparatem ortodontycznym; Zgodny z podwójnym aparatem ortodontycznym; Niezgodny z aparatem ortodontycznym; Tylko z górnym aparatem ortodontycznym; Inne
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost s aparatićem: Kompatibilno sa zubnim aparatićem; Kompatibilno s dvostrukim zubnim aparatićem; Nije kompatibilno sa zubnim aparatićem; Samo gornji zubni aparatić; Ostalo
nb: Kompatibilitet for regulering: Kompatibel med tannregulering; Kompatibel med dobbel tannregulering; Ikke kompatibel med tannregulering; Kun tannregulering oppe; Annet
bg-BG: Съвместимост с брекети: Съвместим с брекети; Съвместим с двойни брекети; Не е съвместим с брекети; Само за горни брекети; Други
fr: Compatibilité avec les appareils dentaires: Compatible avec les appareils dentaires; Compatible avec les appareils dentaires doubles; Non compatible avec les appareils dentaires; Appareils dentaires supérieurs uniquement; Autre
cs: Kompatibilita s výztuhami: Kompatibilní s rovnátky; Kompatibilní s horními i dolními rovnátky; Nekompatibilní s rovnátky; Pouze pro horní rovnátka; Jiné
ko: 치아 교정기 호환성: 교정기 호환; 이중 교정기 호환; 교정기 호환 불가; 상단 교정기 전용; 기타
da: Mundbeskytterkompatibilitet: Kompatibel med tandbøjle; Kompatibel med dobbeltbøjle; Ikke kompatibel med bøjle; Kun overkæbebøjle; Andet
nl: Beugelcompatibiliteit: Compatibel met beugels; Compatibel met dubbele beugels; Niet compatibel met beugels; Alleen bovenbeugels; Overig
de: Spangenkompatibilität: Kompatibel mit Zahnspangen; Kompatibel mit Doppelzahnspangen; Nicht kompatibel mit Zahnspangen; Nur obere Zahnspange; Sonstige
sv: Kompatibel med tandställning: Kompatibel med tandställning; Kompatibel med dubbel tandställning; Ej kompatibel med tandställning; Endast övre tandställning; Övrigt
ja: ブレース適合性: 歯列矯正器対応; 上下歯列矯正器対応; 歯列矯正器非対応; 上の歯列矯正器のみ対応; その他
vi: Độ tương thích với niềng răng: Tương thích với niềng răng; Tương thích với niềng răng kép; Không tương thích với niềng răng; Chỉ niềng răng hàm trên; Khác
pt-PT: Compatibilidade do aparelho ortodôntico: Compatível com aparelho; Compatível com aparelho duplo; Incompatível com aparelho; Apenas aparelho superior; Outro
en: Braces compatibility: Compatible with braces; Double braces compatible; Not compatible with braces; Upper braces only; Other
lt-LT: Suderinamumas su breketais: Suderinama su breketais; Suderinama su dvigubais breketais; Nesuderinama su breketais; Tik viršutiniams breketams; Kita
es: Compatibilidad con soportes: Compatible con brackets; Compatible con brackets dobles; No compatible con brackets; Solo para brackets superiores; Otro
it: Compatibilità dei tutori: Compatibile con apparecchio ortodontico; Compatibile con apparecchio doppio; Non compatibile con apparecchio; Solo apparecchio superiore; Altro
tr: Diş teli uyumluluğu: Diş teliyle uyumlu; Çift diş teliyle uyumlu; Diş teliyle uyumlu değil; Yalnızca üst diş teli; Diğer
sk-SK: Kompatibilita svoriek: Kompatibilné so strojčekom na zuby; Kompatibilné s dvojitým strojčekom; Nekompatibilné so strojčekom na zuby; Len na horný strojček; Iné
pt-BR: Compatibilidade dos suportes: Compatível com aparelho ortodôntico; Compatível com aparelho ortodôntico duplo; Não compatível com aparelho ortodôntico; Apenas aparelho ortodôntico superior; Outro
hu: Fogszabályzó kompatibilitás: Fogszabályzóval kompatibilis; Dupla fogszabályzóval kompatibilis; Fogszabályzóval nem kompatibilis; Csak felső fogszabályzóhoz; Egyéb
fi: Oikomiskojeen yhteensopivuus: Yhteensopiva hammasrautojen kanssa; Yhteensopiva ylä- ja alarautojen kanssa; Ei yhteensopiva hammasrautojen kanssa; Vain yläraudoille; Muu